Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-619
Act, how cited.

Sections 47-619 to 47-634 shall be known and may be cited
as the Community Corrections Act.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 31;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 44;

Laws 2010, LB864, § 1.